Illinois, session 104th, HB4270.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Highway Code is amended by 5changing Section 6-140 as follows: 6    (605 ILCS 5/6-140)7    Sec. 6-140. Abolishing a road district within Lake County 8or McHenry County with less than 15 miles of roads. A Any 9township in Lake County or McHenry County shall abolish a road 10district of that township if the roads of the road district are 11less than 15 centerline miles in length, as determined by the 12county engineer or county superintendent of highways. A road 13district is abolished on the expiration of the term of office 14of the highway commissioner of the road district facing 15abolition following the determination by the county engineer 16or county superintendent of highways of the length, in 17centerline mileage, of the roads within the road district to 18be abolished.19    On the date of abolition: all the rights, powers, duties, 20assets, property, liabilities, obligations, and 21responsibilities of the road district shall by operation of 22law vest in and be assumed by the township; the township board 23of trustees shall assume all taxing authority of a road   HB4270- 2 -LRB104 16545 LNS 29943 b1district abolished under this Section and shall exercise all 2duties and responsibilities of the highway commissioner as 3provided in this Code; and for purposes of distribution of 4revenue, the township shall assume the powers, duties, and 5obligations of the road district. The township board of 6trustees may enter into a contract with the county, a 7municipality, or a private contractor to administer the roads 8added to its jurisdiction under this Section.9(Source: P.A. 101-230, eff. 8-9-19.)